District of Columbia statutes.
8-751

Definitions.

[Not funded].

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-223, § 201, 62 DCR 227
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-223: Section 301(b) of D.C. Law 20-223 provided (1) that §§ 201-203 of the act shall apply for the tax year in which its fiscal effect has been included in an approved budget and financial plan; (2) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and (3) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of §§ 201-203.